src/dictionaries/he_IL.dic
אבירינו/c
אגסינו/c
אדריכליותיכן/c
אווילויותיכן/c
אולימפיי/c
אופוזיציותיו/c
אוצו/d
אורותיו/c
אזעקותיו/c
אחזי/d
אטומנו/c
אידכם/c
אייני/d
איליו/c
אינהלצייתה/c
אינקובטוריה/c
איתנת/c
אכפי/d
אליטותיו/c
אלתורו/c
אמלוליה/c
אנדרואידיהן/c
אנסיהם/c
אנפפי/d
אסטרונומיותיו/c
אספקטיכם/c
אפיקורסותו/c
אפרי/d
אצותיהם/c
אקולוגיותינו/c
ארומתן/c
ארכיטקטורתי/c
אשליותיה/c
אשפזי/d
בארותינו/c
בדקי/d
בהרותיכן/c
בונבוניירותינו/c
בזבזנותי/c
בחלי/d
ביביכן/c
ביטולן/c
ביימי/d
בירותיי/c
בלופיכם/c
בלסי/d
במותיו/c
בעטי/d
בצורתה/c
ברואיכם/c
ברחי/d
ברכיי/c
גאוניהן/c
גבבי/d
גבשושיו/c
גדפי/d
גוזו/d
גוזלה/c
גורמו/c
גטייך/c
גיטרתכם/c
גייסי/d
גירוזיה/c
גלולתן/c
גלשי/d
גמיעותיכם/c
געייתכם/c
גערי/d
גרימתך/c
גרסי/d
דאודורנטיך/c
דבגו/d
דגמן/c
דוגו/d
דודך/c
דוקטורנטיי/c
דחסי/d
דיבוריתכן/c
דיירתה/c
דיקוריך/c
דללו/d
דלתאותינו/c
דסקסי/d
דקדק/c
דרווישייך/c
דרסי/d
האדמותינו/c
האהילי/d
האמירי/d
הבאישי/d
הבהיל/c
הבחיני/d
הבכירי/d
הברגותיכם/c
הבריאי/d
הגבילי/d
הגידי/d
הגירו/c
הגלישי/d
הגרילי/d
הדגישי/d
הדהודכן/c
הדליפי/d
ההיני/d
ההנותיהן/c
הוחילי/d
הוספתכן/c
הוציאי/d
הושיעי/d
הזדכותם/c
הזדמני/d
הזדקפי/d
הזיחי/d
הזמיני/d
הזנחתו/c
הזקיפי/d
החזירי/d
החלותייך/c
החליאי/d
החמיאי/d
החריבי/d
החתימי/d
החתמותיה/c
הטליאי/d
היאבקו/d
היאורו/d
היאטמו/d
היאכלויותיה/c
היאלצו/d
היאמרי/d
היאספי/d
היארזי/d
היבדלי/d
היבזזי/d
היבללו/d
היבעלו/d
היבקעו/d
היגוזו/d
היגזרו/d
היגייניי/c
היגמרו/d
היגרבו/d
היגרפו/d
הידגמו/d
הידחסי/d
הידלקו/d
הידרכו/d
היהפכו/d
היהפכויותיהם/c
היוודעו/d
היוועצו/d
היוותרו/d
היזוני/d
היזנחי/d
היזרעי/d
היחבלי/d
היחוגי/d
היחכרותי/c
היחלמי/d
היחמדי/d
היחנקי/d
היחפפי/d
היחקקי/d
היחרטי/d
היחרתי/d
היחשקי/d
היטבלי/d
היטלטלי/d
היטעמו/d
היטרדי/d
היכבשו/d
היכללויותיה/c
היכמרי/d
היכרתי/d
הילחשי/d
הימהלי/d
הימחקי/d
הימלכויותיהם/c
הימסקי/d
הימשכו/d
הינגפו/d
הינטעו/d
הינעה/c
הינקמי/d
הינתקו/d
היסחפו/d
היספותם/c
היספחו/d
היעברו/d
היעלבי/d
היעקדי/d
היעשקי/d
היפגעותן/c
היפלאי/d
היפקחי/d
היפרשי/d
היצמדי/d
היצרדותן/c
היקבצי/d
היקלטי/d
היקרשי/d
הירטטי/d
הירקבי/d
הירתעויותיכם/c
הישאלי/d
הישחטי/d
הישללו/d
הישנקו/d
הישרכי/d
היתלותן/c
היתלשי/d
היתקפי/d
הכליבי/d
הכנעותיהם/c
הכשירי/d
הלווייתו/c
הלעיזי/d
המונייך/c
המסי/d
המשכותיך/c
הנחילי/d
הנמקותיי/c
הנשימי/d
הסיתה/c
הסליקי/d
הסתגלי/d
הסתגרותי/c
הסתכני/d
הסתנכרנותך/c
הסתפחי/d
העיקי/d
העלים/c
העריכי/d
הפיסי/d
הפעלותיך/c
הפציצי/d
הפשילי/d
הצטיידי/d
הצטלקותי/c
הצטעצעי/d
הצליחי/d
הקדיחי/d
הקלדותינו/c
הקלישי/d
הקשיבי/d
הרטבותיך/c
הרטיטי/d
הרעישי/d
השביתי/d
השגתן/c
השירי/d
השמישי/d
השתבצותן/c
השתגעי/d
השתטחי/d
השתלחי/d
השתפדויותיכם/c
השתפלי/d
השתתקי/d
התאחרי/d
התאמצותן/c
התאפקי/d
התבהמי/d
התבססי/d
התבשמותכן/c
התגודדי/d
התגנדרי/d
התהפכי/d
התחבטויותייך/c
התחייבי/d
התחסדי/d
התחשלי/d
התייבשויותינו/c
התיילדי/d
התייתמי/d
התכסחי/d
התלבשותה/c
התלוצצי/d
התמודדי/d
התמנפי/d
התמרמרויותיו/c
התמשכי/d
התנווני/d
התנענעי/d
התנשמותנו/c
התנתבי/d
התעללי/d
התעצבני/d
התערערויותייך/c
התפגלי/d
התפכחי/d
התפצחי/d
התפשלויותיו/c
התפשרי/d
התקיפי/d
התקרזלי/d
התרגלותה/c
התרהבי/d
התריעי/d
ויטמיני/c
זגזגי/d
זהרוריי/c
זכאויותיהן/c
זנקי/d
זרותי/c
חגירתך/c
חומצותיי/c
חונו/d
חזירתן/c
חילוטיהן/c
חלודתך/c
חמיסותיי/c
חמקי/d
חסרי/c
חרגי/d
חריגותיי/c
חשקם/c
טוחו/d
טופוגרפייתן/c
טירוניתנו/c
טפטפי/d
טפירנו/c
יבואניתה/c
יחיאל/c
ייתוריה/c
יקבו/c
כבאיתכן/c
כווצי/d
כוסיתן/c
כיעוריי/c
כנסייתנו/c
כפפי/d
כרטיסניותיי/c
לביאתכן/c
לולייניכם/c
לוני/d
לימוניותיה/c
לפפי/d
מאדת/c
מבושיהן/c
מגלשנו/c
מדעניכן/c
מודוסך/c
מונחיו/c
מורשעי/c
מזער/c
מחאי/d
מחלוקותיך/c
מטדוריכם/c
מיטוכונדריונך/c
מיצך/c
מכפלתה/c
מלכותך/c
מנדולינותיי/c
מסגריך/c
מספנותיה/c
מענקיך/c
מפעילתי/c
מציליהם/c
מצקי/d
מקלוניה/c
מרושתי/c
מרשעותיכן/c
משיבי/c
משרעתכן/c
מתיקויותיכם/c
נאמנינו/c
נגחי/d
נדבניותיי/c
נוסחותיו/c
נועי/d
נחשוניהן/c
נינג'ותיך/c
נכסייך/c
נפדי/c
נפקי/d
נקניקייתכן/c
סאבי/d
סאתך/c
סוברניותה/c
סחיטת/c
סיועיה/c
סיימי/d
סינונימיי/c
סלמנדרותיה/c
סממי/d
ססמאותיך/c
סקלו/c
סרסרי/d
עגולי/c
עונייך/c
עייני/d
עיכוסה/c
עלטותיי/c
ענטזי/d
עסקניי/c
ערבוני/c
ערמי/d
עששתם/c
פולחניכם/c
פוסי/d
פחיתת/c
פילוגיכן/c
פישורנו/c
פכפכי/d
פנטזיונרי/c
פעוטכן/c
פעפעי/d
פרדיגמתנו/c
פריטכם/c
פרמטי/d
פרתי/c
צביעותנו/c
צברחי/d
צחותכן/c
צירופן/c
צלקו/d
צנוניי/c
צריבותיכן/c
צרכי/d
קדנציותינו/c
קומותיכם/c
קורקבניהם/c
קטבי/d
קילוחיו/c
קלידותיה/c
קנוניותייך/c
קנטרי/d
קצרניתן/c
קרעיי/c
קשטי/d
רבגוניותכם/c
רווקיו/c
רחפי/d
רחשיהן/c
ריקניי/c
רעותיה/c
רצדי/d
רצעניותיו/c
שאפי/d
שארנו/c
שדרניותיהן/c
שוחו/d
שורותיה/c
שיבוטיך/c
שימומכן/c
שכבי/d
שכירותיהם/c
שלשולם/c
שממו/d
שעוריה/c
שפדי/d
שקידותיו/c
שרטי/d
שרשראותיו/c
תגך/c
תועלתיותו/c
תופפי/d
תחיותינו/c
תינוקו/c
תלמיכם/c
תסכולכם/c
תססי/d
תפירתי/c
תקשובה/c
תשיעייתך/c
